District of Columbia statutes.
50-2535

Reporting requirements and oversight for each performance parking zone.

(a)

Before implementation, or upon November 25, 2008, whichever is later, the District Department of Transportation (“DDOT”) shall transmit a detailed performance parking zone plan to the Council and to the Chairs of all ANCs within a performance parking zone. The plan shall set zone-specific parking management targets and shall detail parking changes, which may include new parking restrictions and curbside parking fees.

(b)

At the request of any ANC or Ward Councilmember representing all or part of a performance parking zone, DDOT shall conduct public meetings to provide an update on parking management targets and an opportunity for public comment.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

The Mayor shall provide quarterly reports to the Council and make the reports available on its website detailing the following information for each performance parking zone:

(1)

Quarterly revenue;

(2)

Quarterly revenue associated with performance parking meter pricing;

(3)

Quarterly expenditures on non-automobile transportation improvements; and

(4)

The balance of funds available for additional non-automobile transportation investments.

(e)

Repealed.

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-279, § 6, 55 DCR 11059
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 6042(e), 59 DCR 8025
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “for each performance parking zone” for “of performance parking pilot zones” in the section heading; deleted “pilot” following “performance parking” twice in the first sentence of (a); rewrote (b); repealed (c), which read: “If a performance parking pilot zone is not meeting established parking management targets after the 2nd quarter of operation, DDOT shall re-evaluate the strategies used and implement a revised plan. Within 30 days after the 2nd quarter of operation, any revised plan shall be implemented and transmitted to the Council and ANCs, pursuant to subsection (a) of this section”; rewrote (d); and repealed (e), which read: “Sixty days before the expiration of a performance parking pilot zone, the Mayor shall produce a final report evaluating the success of the performance parking pilot zone, including recommendations for continuation of some or all aspects of the pilot program within the zone.”